Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-108
County board, defined.

The term county board includes both county commissioners and supervisors, as the case may be.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 6, p. 389;

R.S.1913, § 6294;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. I, § 7, p. 546;

C.S.1922, § 5814;

C.S.1929, § 77-107;

R.S.1943, § 77-108.